Utah statutes.
31A-1-105.   Presumption of jurisdiction.

(1)  Any insurer, including the Workers' Compensation Fund created under Chapter 33, that provides coverage of a resident of this state, property located in this state, or a business activity conducted in this state, or that engages in any activity described in Subsections 31A-15-102(2)(a) through (h), is:

(a)  doing an insurance business in this state; and

(b)  subject to the jurisdiction of the insurance commissioner and the courts of this state under Sections 31A-2-309 and 31A-2-310 to the extent of that coverage or activity.

(2)  Any person doing or purporting to do an insurance business in this state as defined in  Section 31A-1-301 is subject to the jurisdiction of the insurance commissioner and this title, unless the insurer can establish that the exemptions of Section 31A-1-103 apply.

(3)  This section does not limit the jurisdiction of the courts of this state under other applicable law.

